Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2136
Utilities district; collection of sewer use fee for city; powers cumulative.

The powers granted in sections 14-2134 and 14-2135 to cities of the metropolitan class and metropolitan utilities districts are cumulative and not in derogation or amendment of the existing powers of each.

Laws 1959, c. 32, § 3, p. 187;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1110;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 36.